District of Columbia statutes.
48-1002

Repealed

Procedure for establishing a drug free zone.

Repealed.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-270, § 3, 43 DCR 4493
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 226, 53 DCR 8610
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 226, 56 DCR 7413
May 6, 2015, D.C. Law 20-274, § 3, 61 DCR 12117
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 226 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 226 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 226 of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 226 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 226 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 226 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 48-1001.
D.C. Law 18-88, in subsec. (a), substituted “480 consecutive hours” for “240 consecutive hours”; and rewrote subsecs. (b)(1), (2).
D.C. Law 16-306, in subsec. (a), substituted “240 consecutive hours” for “120 consecutive hours”.
1981 Ed., § 33-582.
This section is referenced in § 48-1001 and § 48-1004.